Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3420
Transfer on death
deed property; acquisition by purchaser or lender; protections; lien for inheritance
tax.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(b) of this section and subject
to a determination of the rights of any parties to an action commenced pursuant
to subsection (c) or (d) of section 76-3410, if property or any
interest therein transferred to a beneficiary by a transfer on death deed
is acquired by a purchaser or lender for value from a beneficiary of a transfer
on death deed, the purchaser or lender takes title free of any claims of the
estate, personal representative, surviving spouse, creditors, and any other
person claiming by or through the transferor of the transfer on death deed, including any heir or beneficiary of
the estate of the transferor, and the purchaser or lender shall
not incur any personal liability to the estate, personal representative, surviving
spouse, creditors, or any other person claiming by or through the transferor
of the transfer on death deed, including
any heir or beneficiary of the estate of the transferor, whether
or not the conveyance by the transfer on death deed was proper. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, to be protected under
this section, a purchaser or lender need not inquire whether a transferor
or beneficiary of the transfer on death deed acted properly in making the
conveyance to the beneficiary by the transfer on death deed.

(b) A purchaser or lender for value from a beneficiary of
a transfer on death deed does not take title free of any lien for inheritance
tax under section 77-2003.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 20;

Laws 2013, LB345, § 4.